vi: Vật liệu kết dính: Nhôm; Gốm; Kim cương; Bột mài; Đá lửa; Garnet; Thủy tinh; Silicon carbide; Bùi nhùi thép; Khác
ko: 연마 재료: 알루미늄; 세라믹; 다이아몬드; 금강사; 부싯돌; 석류석; 유리; 실리콘 카바이드; 쇠수세미; 기타
it: Materiale abrasivo: Alluminio; Ceramica; Diamante; Smeriglio; Pietra focaia; Granato; Vetro; Carburo di silicio; Lana d'acciaio; Altro
pt-PT: Material abrasivo: Alumínio; Cerâmica; Diamante; Esmeril; Pedra; Granada; Vidro; Carboneto de silício; Lã de aço; Outro
sl-SI: Abrazivni material: Aluminij; Keramika; Diamant; Smirek; Kremen; Granat; Steklo; Silicijev karbid; Jeklena volna; Drug
el: Λειαντικό υλικό: Αλουμίνιο; Κεραμικό; Διαμάντι; Σμύριδα; Πυρόλιθος; Γρανάτη; Γυαλί; Καρβίδιο του πυριτίου; Ατσαλόμαλλο; Άλλο
tr: Aşındırıcı malzeme: Alüminyum; Seramik; Elmas; Emery; Çakmaktaşı; Garnet; Cam; Silisyum karbür; Çelik Yünü; Diğer
fr: Matériau abrasif: Aluminum; Céramique; Diamant; Émeri; Silex; Garnet; Verre; Carbure de silicium; Paille de fer; Autre
hu: Csiszolóanyag: Alumínium; Kerámia; Gyémánt; Csiszolókő; Kovakő; Gránátkő; Üveg; Szilícium-karbid; Acélgyapot; Egyéb
bg-BG: Абразивен материал: Алуминий; Керамика; Диамант; Шмиргел; Кремък; Гранат; Стъкло; Силициев карбид; Стоманена вълна; Други
de: Schleifmaterial: Aluminium; Keramik; Diamant; Schmirgel; Feuerstein; Granat; Glas; Siliziumkarbid; Stahlwolle; Sonstiges
fi: Liimamateriaali: Alumiini; Keraaminen; Timantti; Smirgeli; Pii; Granaatti; Lasi; Piikarbidi; Teräsvilla; Muu
pt-BR: Material abrasivo: Alumínio; Cerâmica; Diamante; Esmeril; Pedra; Granada; Vidro; Carboneto de silício; Palha de aço; Outro
en: Abrasive material: Aluminum; Ceramic; Diamond; Emery; Flint; Garnet; Glass; Silicon carbide; Steel wool; Other
ru: Абразивный материал: Алюминий; Керамика; Алмаз; Наждак; Кремень; Гранат; Стекло; Карбид кремния; Стальная вата; Другое
zh-CN: 研磨材料: 铝; 陶瓷制品; 钻石; 金刚砂; 燧石; 石榴石; 玻璃; 碳化硅; 钢丝绒; 其他
da: Slibende materiale: Aluminum; Keramik; Diamant; Emery; Flint; Granat; Glas; Silikonecarbid; Ståluld; Andet
zh-TW: 磨料材料: 鋁; 陶瓷; 鑽石; 金剛砂; 燧石; 石榴石; 玻璃; 碳化矽; 鋼絲絨; 其他
nl: Schurend materiaal: Aluminium; Keramiek; Diamant; Amaril; Vuursteen; Granaat; Glas; Siliciumcarbide; Staalwol; Andere
sv: Slipande material: Aluminium; Keramisk; Diamant; Smärgel; Flinta; Granat; Glas; Kiselkarbid; Stålull; Övrigt
cs: Brusný materiál: Hliník; Keramika; Diamant; Smirek; Křesací kámen; Granát; Sklo; Karbid křemíku; Ocelová vlna; Jiné
hr-HR: Abrazivni materijal: Aluminij; Keramika; Dijamant; Brusni papir; Kvarc; Granat; Staklo; Silicijev karbid; Čelična vuna; Ostalo
es: Material abrasivo: Aluminio; Cerámica; Diamante; Esmeril; Pedernal; Granate; Vidrio; Carburo de silicio; Estropajo de acero; Otros
lt-LT: Abrazyvinė medžiaga: Aliuminis; Keramika; Deimantas; Švitras; Titnagas; Granatas; Stiklas; Silicio karbidas; Plieno vata; Kita
sk-SK: Brúsne materiály: Hliníkový; Keramický; Diamantový; Šmirgľový; Kremenný; Granátový; Sklenný; Karbid kremíka; Drôtenkový; Iné
ja: 研磨材: アルミニウム; セラミック; ダイヤモンド; エメリー; フリント; ガーネット; ガラス; 炭化ケイ素; スチールウール; その他
ro-RO: Material abraziv: Aluminiu; Ceramic; Diamant; Emeri; Cremene; Granat; Sticlă; Carbură de siliciu; Vată de oțel; Altele
pl: Materiał ścierny: Aluminium; Ceramika; Diament; Szmergiel; Flint; Granat; Szkło; Węglik krzemu; Wełna stalowa; Inne
th: วัสดุขัด: อะลูมิเนียม; เซรามิก; เพชร; กากกะรุน; หินไฟ; โกเมน; แก้ว; ซิลิคอนคาร์ไบด์; ฝอยเหล็ก; อื่นๆ
nb: Klebende materiale: Aluminium; Keramikk; Diamant; Emer; Flint; Granat; Glass; Silisiumkarbid; Stålull; Annet